California statutes. Financial Code
As used in this chapter, “premium financing” means the activities of a company engaging in the business of advancing money directly or indirectly to an insurer or producer at the request of an insured pursuant to the terms of a premium finance agreement, wherein the insured has assigned the unearned premiums, accrued dividends or loss payments as security for such advancement in payment of premiums on insurance contracts only, and acquiring premium finance agreements, and does not include the financing of insurance contract premiums purchased in connection
 with the financing of goods and services. The amount of such advancement in payment of premiums must bear a reasonable relationship to the premium or premiums being financed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18564.

As used in this chapter, “premium finance agreement” means a loan contract, note, agreement or obligation by which an insured agrees to pay to a company in installments the principal amount advanced by the company to an insurer or producer in payment of premium on an insurance contract or contracts, plus charges, with the assignment as security therefor of the unearned premiums, accrued dividends or loss payments, the final installment due date of the agreement not to extend beyond the term of the insurance contract included in the agreement having the latest expiration date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18565.

As used in this chapter, “company” means a premium finance agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18566.

As used in this chapter, “principal balance” means the difference between the amount of the premium and fees charged by the insurer or producer and the downpayment on the premium.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18567.

As used in this chapter, “finance charge” means any amount which the insured agrees to pay the company in excess of the premium and fees charged by the insurer or producer, and exclusive of the cost of credit life insurance and attorney fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General [18580. - 18596.]

18580.

A premium finance agency desiring the full authority which may be conferred by this division, shall, in respect to any lending operations other than insurance premium financing, be required to amend its articles of incorporation and meet the requirements of this division as if it were making an original application for authority to organize under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18581.

The articles of incorporation of any corporation organized under this division as a premium finance agency shall include reference to that fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18582.

Capital stock of any premium finance agency shall not be less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) and need not exceed that sum regardless of the number of branch offices or business locations which may be authorized under the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18583.

Before a premium finance agency commences business or opens a branch office or place of business, there must be paid in cash, for the benefit of the agency, 100 percent of the amount of the minimum capital stock required under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18584.

An insurance premium finance agreement, as defined in Section 18564, may be prepared in the office of an insurance producer licensed by the Department of Insurance, and mailed or otherwise delivered to a premium finance agency for acceptance without the office of the producer thereby being constituted a place of business of the company. A producer at whose office a premium finance agreement is so prepared shall not be considered to be a broker of the company as that term is used in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18585.

In the event of any conflict in the provisions of this chapter with the provisions of any other chapter in this division, the provisions of this chapter shall control with regard to a premium finance agency or to insurance premium financing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18586.

The provisions of Sections 18023, 18024, 18120, 18205, 18268, 18269, 18271, 18272, 18274, and 18455 shall not apply to a premium finance agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

18587.

The provisions of Sections 18607, 18625, and 18626 shall not apply to any bona fide loan with a principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more or to a premium finance agency in connection with such loans if the provisions of this section are not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18588.

Unless the insured has notice of the assignment of a premium finance agreement, payment thereunder by him to the last known assignee of the agreement shall be binding upon all subsequent assignees.

Assignment of the premium finance agreement shall not cut off any defenses which the insured would have against the company or an assignee of the agreement arising from obligations imposed by this division.

The obligations and rights of a premium finance agency, under this chapter, shall also apply to the assignee of a premium finance agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18589.

At any time during the term of the premium finance agreement, but not later than one year after the last payment thereunder, the company shall upon written request of the insured, give or mail to him a written statement of the dates and amounts of payment, and the total amount, if any, unpaid thereunder. Such a statement shall be supplied once each year without charge; if any additional statement is requested, the company shall supply such statement at a charge not exceeding one dollar ($1) for each additional statement so supplied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18590.

Upon payment of a loan in full the company upon request shall return the premium finance agreement marked “Paid” to the insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18591.

No filing of the premium finance agreement shall be necessary to perfect the validity of such agreement as a secured transaction as against creditors, subsequent purchasers, pledgees, encumbrances, successors or assigns of the insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18592.

Any downpayment which is made and which is received by the company from the insured, or from the insurance producer on behalf of the insured, shall be held by the company in trust for and in transit to the insurer, and shall be paid to the insurer, together with the balance of the premium payable pursuant to the terms of the premium finance agreement within 30 days from the effective date of the policy, or within 30 days after the receipt of a proper premium finance agreement by the company, or within 15 days after the company has mailed to the insured notice of a revised finance agreement pursuant to Section 18606, whichever is later. In the event that the premium is
 paid to the insurance agent or broker of record, such agent or broker of record shall not be deemed the agent of the company by reason of such payment.

Upon request of the commissioner, the company shall furnish an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of such trust accounts pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 487.)
-------------------------------------------

18593.

The downpayments received by the company under the provisions of Section 18592, may be held by the company in trust in a separate bank account or depository, or in lieu thereof, the company may maintain a time deposit with a bank, savings and loan association, or comparable institution, or obtain a certificate or certificates of deposit or a clean and irrevocable letter or letters of credit from a bank, in an amount at least equal to the average amount of such downpayments being held at any given time by the company as ascertained by the commissioner, and which are payable to the insurer pursuant to the terms of the premium finance agreement. Such
 deposits, certificates, or a clean and irrevocable letter or letters of credit shall be held in trust for the benefit of the insureds, as their relative interests in such downpayments may exist at any given time, and in the event of the insolvency of a company, such funds on deposit under the provisions of this section or as represented by a certificate or certificates of deposit or a clean and irrevocable letter or letters of credit shall be first applied to remitting the amount of the downpayment to the insureds on all premium finance agreements upon which the company has not then forwarded in full the downpayments collected from and then being held for insureds, and, if insufficient to pay all such amounts in full, then such funds shall be applied for such purposes pro rata.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18594.

Any corporation organized as an industrial loan company other than a premium finance agency shall conduct any insurance premium financing business under the authority of this chapter and it shall be subject to all of the provisions of this chapter in respect to such business, as if it were a premium finance agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18595.

A premium finance agency shall not incorporate the words “industrial loan company” in its corporate name, on its loan forms, or in its advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18596.

A premium finance company may issue or sell investment certificates only (a) to its customers directly in connection with the financing of premiums for those customers, provided that the aggregate finance charges, including interest paid or not paid on those investment certificates, do not exceed those charges permitted under Section 18626 and (b) to any institutional investors, governmental agency, or instrumentality as the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation may designate by rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 131.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Provisions of Premium Finance Agreements [18605. - 18611.]

18605.

A premium finance agreement shall be in writing and the printed portion thereof shall be in at least eight-point type. The agreement shall set forth:

1. The names and addresses of the insured and the company, and the date of the agreement.

2. A description of the insurance contracts for which the premiums are advanced including the total amount of the premiums and fees and a specific breakdown thereof by policies and a general description of coverages.

3. The amount of the
 downpayment.

4. The cost, if any, for credit life insurance.

5. The principal balance.

6. The finance charges.

7. The unpaid balance.

8. The due date of the first installment.

9. The number, amount and frequency of payment of the installments.

10. A statement that the insured may prepay the full amount due and receive a refund credit of the unearned finance charge, in the manner provided by Section 18629.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18606.

A premium finance agreement shall not be executed by or on behalf of the insured when it contains any blank space to be filled in thereafter; however, if any insurance contract, premiums for which are advanced or to be advanced under the agreement, has not been issued at the time of execution and the premium finance agreement so provides, the name of the insurer, the policy number and the due date of the first installment may be left blank and inserted later. In connection with the financing of an additional premium or policies, upon the completion of the computations necessary to determine the amount of the revised unpaid balance and the number and amount of future
 installment payments, the company shall mail notice of the changes to the insured at his address shown in the agreement. The notice of the revised finance agreement shall set forth:

(a) The unpaid balance, as adjusted.

(b) The number and frequency of each installment under the revised finance agreement.

(c) The amount of each installment.

(d) A statement to the insured that he may disaffirm the revised finance agreement by mailing, to the company’s office, notice of his intention to do so within 10 days of the company’s mailing of the notice of the revised finance agreement.

(e) A statement to the insured that the company may, in the event he disaffirms, cancel his insurance contract or
 contracts as provided in Section 18608, except that the 10-day period required by that section shall be deemed to commence with the mailing of the notice of the revised finance agreement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18607.

Upon receipt of the loan form the company shall promptly mail to the insured at the address shown in the agreement, or deliver to the insured personally, either a notice to the effect that the application for a loan is rejected or a copy of the agreement, thereby signifying acceptance by the company, or if the agreement contained any blank space when it was executed by or on behalf of the insured and such blank space was subsequently filled in, a copy of the agreement as so filled in and the insured shall in such event have 10 days in which to disaffirm his obligation under the premium finance agreement by giving written notice thereof to the producer and the company. In
 the event the agreement is not disaffirmed by the insured, the agreement shall be as binding an obligation of the insured as if the agreement were complete on its face when it was executed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18608.

(a) A premium finance agreement may contain a power of attorney or other authority enabling the company to cancel the insurance contract or contracts listed in the agreement in the event of default in the terms thereof.

(b) Upon the exercise of such a right to cancel, the company shall mail to the insured, to his or her last known address or to the address shown on the premium finance agreement at least 10 days prior to cancellation, a notice of its intent to cancel the
 insurance contract or contracts. 

(c) The liability of a company to any person or corporation upon the exercise of such a right or authority of cancellation shall be limited to the amount of the principal balance, except in the event of willful failure by the company to mail the notice required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18609.

All statutory, regulatory and contractual restrictions providing that the insured or the insurer shall not cancel the insurance contract unless the insured or the insurer first satisfies such restrictions by giving a prescribed notice of cancellation to a governmental agency, the insurer, the insured, the holder of a security interest in the subject of the insurance, or other prescribed party, shall not be affected by the provisions of this division. However, any cancellation notice period required by such statutory, regulatory or contractual restriction shall not be cumulative to the period required by Section 18606 or 18608. If cancellation of the insurance contract is
 initiated by the company under the terms of this division, the insurer shall (in accordance with the requirement for a prescribed notice), on behalf of itself or the insured, give such notice to the governmental agency, the holder of a security interest in the subject of the insurance or other prescribed party; and the insurer shall determine and calculate the effective date of cancellation (in accordance with the terms of that prescribed notice) from the date it receives the notice of request for cancellation from the company. In no instance shall the effective date of cancellation be prior to that established by the company.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18610.

The insurer within a reasonable time after the effective date of cancellation shall return whatever gross unearned premiums or accrued dividends are payable under the insurance contract to the company, which financed the insurance contract, for the benefit of the insured. Whenever any funds are received by the company which are in excess of the amount due to the company, such an excess shall be remitted promptly to the insured or to his order or to the insurance agent for the account of the insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 356, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18611.

At the time of mailing the notice required by Section 18606 or 18608, the employee of the company who is doing the mailing shall prepare and sign an affidavit setting forth the following:

(a) The name and address of the employee doing the mailing.

(b) That the employee is over 18 years of age.

(c) The date and place of deposit in the mail.

(d) The addressee’s name and address as shown on the envelope mailed.

(e) That the envelope weas sealed and deposited in the mail with the postage thereon fully paid.

An affidavit of mailing, prepared as prescribed in this section, shall raise a rebuttable presumption that the notice was mailed to the addressee stated in the affidavit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Limitation on Finance Charges [18625. - 18631.]

18625.

A premium finance agency shall not, except as otherwise provided by law, impose, take, receive, reserve or charge a finance charge which in the aggregate is greater than that which is permitted by this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18626.

A premium finance agency may, in a premium finance agreement, contract for, charge, receive, and collect a finance charge which shall not exceed in the aggregate:

(a) Two percent per month on that part of the unpaid principal balance of any loan up to, including, but not in excess of, one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) One percent per month on any remainder of such unpaid principal balance in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

As used in this article “consumer insurance premium
 finance loan” shall mean an insurance premium finance loan where the insurance policies which are security for the loan are for personal, family or household use.

(c) As an alternative to the charges authorized by subdivisions (a) and (b), a premium finance agency may contract for and receive charges at a rate not exceeding 1.6 percent per month on the unpaid principal balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18627.

If the finance charge computed under Section 18626 is less than twenty-five dollars ($25), a minimum finance charge of twenty-five dollars ($25) may be imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 984.)
-------------------------------------------

18628.

The finance charge may be computed from the effective date of the insurance coverage, provided that the company shall pay the premium due the insurer, either:

(a) Within 30 days from the effective date of the insurance coverage; or

(b) Within 30 days after the receipt by the company of a proper premium finance agreement; or

(c) Within 15 days after the company has mailed to the insured, notice of a revised finance agreement pursuant to Section 18606 whichever is later.

If the conditions of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) are not met the finance charge shall be computed from the date the proceeds of the loan are forwarded to the insurer. In the event the company receives a proper premium finance agreement later than 60 days from the effective date of the policy financed, a proportioned adjustment of the finance charge shall be made after such 60-day period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18629.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any premium finance agreement to the contrary, any insured may pay the obligation in full at any time before maturity of the final installment. If he does so, he shall receive a refund credit of the unearned finance charge computed in accordance with Section 18635 or 18637, except where the amount of the refund credit is less than one dollar ($1) no refund need be made, and except that where the earned finance charge amounts to less than the minimum finance charge permitted by Section 18627, the company may retain as an earned finance charge a sum equal to the minimum permitted by Section 18627 or the maximum prescribed by Section 18627,
 whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18630.

In the event that the insurance policy or policies which are the subject of a premium finance agreement are canceled by the insured or by the insurer, for any cause, the insured shall be entitled to receive a refund credit of the unearned finance charge. This refund credit shall be calculated in the same manner as prescribed in Section 18629, and shall be paid to the insured within a reasonable time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18631.

(a) A premium finance agreement may provide for the payment of a default charge of one dollar ($1) to a maximum of 5 percent of the delinquent installment, in the event of a default for a period of not less than 10 days in the payment of any scheduled installment under the terms of a premium finance agreement. That charge may not be collected more than once for the same default and may be collected at the time of the default or at any time thereafter. If the default charge is deducted from any payment received after default occurs, and the
 deduction results in the default of a subsequent installment, no charge may be made for the resulting default.

(b) A premium finance agreement may provide for the payment of a dishonored check fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) for actual expenses incurred in the processing of a dishonored check.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Charges on Scheduled Balances [18634. - 18643.]

18634.

This article is applicable only to premium finance agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18635.

Whenever the interest or charges, or interest and charges deducted in advance exceed the maximum provided by this division, by reason of subsequent repayment of the loan, a new loan, refinancing, or otherwise, or any portion thereof prior to maturity, such excess shall be rebated to the borrower or credited on any balance owing by the borrower to the company. The rebate shall be the difference between the total of the precomputed charge, any charge for extending the first due date, plus any default or deferment charges and the charges at the contract rate computed on unpaid principal balances for the number of days actually elapsed by applying each payment first to charges
 and the remainder to principal. The tender, by the borrower or at his request, of an amount equal to the unpaid balance less the required rebate must be accepted by the company in full payment of the loan contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18636.

(a) As an alternative to the provisions of Section 18635, if a loan is repayable in substantially equal and consecutive monthly installments of principal and charges combined, the first of which is due not less than 15 days nor more than one month and 15 days from the date the loan is made, a company may precompute charges and apply payments as provided in this article.

(b) The total charges which would be earned if the loan contract were repaid exactly according to its terms, at the monthly rate stated in the loan contract, may be precomputed when the loan is made and added to the
 principal of the loan. Every payment may be applied to the combined total of principal and precomputed charges until the loan contract is fully paid.

(c) The portion of the precomputed charge applicable to any particular monthly installment period shall bear the same ratio to the total precomputed charge, excluding any adjustment made for a first period of more or less than one month, as the balance scheduled to be outstanding during that monthly period bears to the sum of all monthly balances scheduled originally by the loan contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18637.

If a loan contract made under Section 18636 is prepaid in full by cash, a new loan, refinancing or otherwise before the final installment date, the borrower shall receive a rebate of the portion of the precomputed charge applicable to the full installment periods following the installment date nearest the date of such prepayment; provided, however, that if prepayment in full occurs on or before the third installment date the rebate shall be the difference between the total precomputed charge and the charges at the contract rate computed on unpaid principal balances by applying each payment first to charges and the remainder to principal. After the third installment date,
 any prepayment made on or before the 15th day following an installment date shall be deemed to have been made on the installment date preceding such prepayment. The tender, by the borrower or at his request, of an amount equal to the unpaid balance less the required rebate must be accepted by the company in full payment of the loan contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18638.

A special rebate of precomputed charges shall be made if three or more, but not all, installments are prepaid in full at any one time either in one transaction or over a period of time on a loan made under Section 18636. The special rebate shall be equal to the portion of precomputed charge applicable to the last installment period multiplied by the total number of full installment periods such installments and any subsequent installments are prepaid. Such special rebate shall be computed and made at the termination of the loan contract and shall be an addition to any required rebate for prepayment in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18640.

A deferment charge may be charged and collected on a loan made under Section 18636 if the payment date of all wholly unpaid installments on which no default charge has been collected is deferred one or more full months and the loan contract so provides. Such deferment charge shall not exceed the portion of precomputed charge applicable, prior to deferment, to the first deferred monthly installment period multiplied by the number of months the maturity of the contract is deferred. Such number of months shall not exceed the number of full installments which are in default on the date of deferment or which may become due within 15 days of such date. When a deferment charge is
 made, no portion of the precomputed charge shall apply to the installment periods in which no installment payment is required by reason of the deferment. In computing any default charge or required rebate, the portion of the precomputed charge applicable to each deferred balance and installment period following the deferment period and prior to the deferred maturity shall remain the same as that applicable to such balances and periods under the original contract of loan. Such charge may be collected at the time of deferment or at any time thereafter. Any payment received at the time of deferment may be applied first to the deferment charge and the remainder, if any, applied to the unpaid balance of the loan contract; provided, however, if such payment is sufficient to pay, in addition to the appropriate deferment charge, any installment which is in default and the applicable default charge, it shall be first so applied and any such installment shall not be deferred nor subject to the deferment
 charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18642.

If the maturity of a loan made under Section 18636 is accelerated for any reason, the company shall make the same refund or credit as would be required if the loan contract was paid in full on the date of acceleration and the unpaid balance shall be treated as the unpaid principal balance and thereafter the unpaid balance of the loan contract shall bear charges at the agreed rate of charge if the loan contract so provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18643.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law not within this article, with respect to precomputed loans, premium finance agencies derive authority only from this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Interstate Acquisitions [18650. - 18654.]

18650.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following transactions:

(a) An acquisition of control of a California industrial loan company that requires the approval of the commissioner under Section 18138.

(b) A sale or merger that requires the approval of the commissioner under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 4800).

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18651.

Each application filed with the commissioner for an approval under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner requires by rule or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by rule or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18652.

The fee for filing with the commissioner an application for an approval under this chapter is four hundred dollars ($400).

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18653.

(a) The definitions that are set forth in or are applicable to Section 44 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u) apply to this section.

(b) This section does not apply unless each bank involved in an interstate merger transaction (including each insured depository institution that is an affiliate of the surviving, resulting, or purchasing bank) that is organized under the laws of this state or maintains a branch office in this state, is an industrial loan
 company (as defined in Section 4805.10).

(c) The commissioner may approve an interstate merger transaction that is subject to Section 44(b)(2)(B) and (D)(ii) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(B) and (D)(ii)) if the commissioner finds that the transaction is consistent with the public convenience and advantage in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 53.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18654.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt rules to implement this chapter similar to regulations adopted under similar provisions of law contained in Chapter 21.5 (commencing with Section 3750) of Division 1, and for the same or similar reasons. The authority granted to the commissioner by this section is in addition to the authority granted to the commissioner under Section 18347.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 615.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Foreign (Other State) Industrial Loan Companies: Agency Activities [18660. - 18707.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18660. - 18666.]

18660.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Authorized agency activities” means issuing investment certificates, renewing certificates of deposits, as defined in Section 18003.6, closing loans, servicing loans, and receiving payments on loans and other obligations. “Authorized agency activities” includes ministerial functions such as providing loan applications, assembling documents, providing a location for returning documents necessary for making a loan, providing loan account
 information, receiving payments, disbursing loan funds, evaluating loan applications, and other activities that the commissioner may specify by rule or order. However, “authorized agency activities” does not include any other activities that the commissioner may specify by rule or order.

(b) “Branch business unit” means all or substantially all of the business of a branch office of an industrial loan company.

(c) “California”:

(1) When used with respect to an industrial loan company, means a corporation of the type described in Section 18003 organized and licensed under the laws of this state.

(2) When used with respect to an office of an industrial loan company, means an office which is located in this state.

(3) When used with respect to a bank or an office of a bank, has the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 126.5.

(d) “Core business” means the business of issuing investment certificates, making loans, and other activities that the commissioner may specify by rule or order.

(e) “Depository institution affiliate” means a depository institution affiliate within the meaning of Section 18(r) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 1828(r)).

(f) “Facility,” when used with respect to a foreign (other state) industrial loan company, means an office in this state at which the industrial loan company engages in noncore business but at which it does not engage in core business.

(g) “Foreign (other state) industrial loan company” means a corporation of the type described in Section 18003 organized under the laws of any state of the United States, as defined in Section 146.7, other than this state.

(h) “Insured”:

(1) When used with respect to an industrial loan company, means an industrial loan company, the investment certificates of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.).

(2) When used with respect to an investment certificate or deposit, means an investment certificate or deposit that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.).

(i) “Law of
 the domicile,” when used with respect to an industrial loan company, means the law of the state of the United States, as defined in Section 146.7, under which the industrial loan company is organized.

(j) “Noncore business” means all activities permissible for an industrial loan company, except core business, and except those activities prohibited by law or determined by the commissioner by rule or order not to be noncore business.

(k) “Whole business unit” means all or substantially all of the business of an industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 54.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18661.

Each application filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any rule or order issued under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall (if the commissioner requires by rule or order) be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by rule or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18662.

(a) Each foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a facility or a California branch office shall file with the commissioner such reports as and when the commissioner may by rule or order require.

(b) Each report filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any rule or order issued under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall (if the commissioner so requires by rule or order) be
 verified in the manner that the commissioner may by rule or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18663.

Each foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a facility or a California branch office shall make, keep, and preserve at the facility or branch office or at another place that the commissioner may by rule or order approve, the books, accounts, and other records relating to the business of the office, in the form, in the manner, and for the time that the commissioner may by rule or order provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18664.

Fees shall be paid to, and collected by, the commissioner as follows:

(a) Each foreign (other state) industrial loan company that on July 1 of any year maintains a California branch office shall pay, on or before December 20 of that year, the assessment levied under Section 18351.

(b) Each foreign (other state) industrial loan company that on June 1 of any year maintains a facility but no California branch office shall pay, on or
 before the following July 1, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each facility.

(c) If the commissioner makes an examination of a foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a California branch office, the industrial loan company shall pay a fee for the examination in the sum of fifty dollars ($50) per hour for each examiner engaged in the examination plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18665.

(a) Any foreign (other state) industrial loan company is exempted from the restrictions of Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution relating to rates of interest upon the loan or forbearance of any money, goods, or things in action or on accounts after demand.
